Tennessee statutes. Title 66 Property
Part 2

Solar Access Law of 1979

66-9-201. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Solar Access Law of 1979.”

Acts 1979, ch. 259, § 1; T.C.A., §64-9-201.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 8-311.

Law Reviews.

The Easement in Gross Revisited: Transferability and Divisibility Since 1945, 39 Vand. L. Rev. 109 (1986).

66-9-202. Legislative findings and declarations.

The general assembly finds that the use of solar energy can help reduce reliance on depletable energy resources such as oil, natural gas and coal, and that solar energy development should, therefore, be encouraged. Further, that as the use of solar energy systems increases, the possibility of future shading of such systems by buildings or vegetation will also increase. Therefore, the general assembly declares that solar easements may be established to allow the owner of a solar energy system to negotiate for assurance of continued access to sunlight. The general assembly further finds that encouragement and protection of solar energy systems is a valid objective which counties and municipalities may consider in promulgating zoning regulations.

Acts 1979, ch. 259, § 2; T.C.A., §64-9-202.

66-9-203. “Solar energy system” defined.

As used in this part, “solar energy system” means any device, mechanism, structure, apparatus, or part thereof, whose primary purpose is to collect solar energy and convert and store it for useful purposes including heating and cooling buildings or other energy saving processes, or to produce generated power by means of any combination of collecting, transferring, or converting solar generated energy.

Acts 1979, ch. 259, § 3; T.C.A., §64-9-203.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 8-311.

66-9-204. Instruments creating solar easements — Contents.

Any instrument creating a solar easement shall include, but the contents need not be limited to:

A description of the real property subject to the solar easement and a description of the real property benefiting from the solar easement;

The vertical and horizontal angles, expressed in degrees or otherwise, at which the solar easement extends over the real property subject to the solar easement;

Any terms or conditions, or both, under which the solar easement is granted or will terminate;

Any provisions for compensation of the owner of the property benefiting from the solar easement in the event of interference with the enjoyment of the solar easement or compensation of the owner of the property subject to the solar easement for maintaining the solar easement; and

The period of time for which the easement shall run.

The office of energy programs of the department of environment and conservation, pursuant to powers granted in §§ 4-3-510 and 4-3-512(8), is directed to prepare a sample solar easement instrument for use in this state.

Acts 1979, ch. 259, § 4; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §64-9-204; Acts 1983, ch. 429, § 24; 2016, ch. 743, § 17.

Amendments. The 2016 amendment rewrote (b), which read, “The division of energy of the department of economic and community development, pursuant to powers granted in §§4-3-708 and4-3-710(8), is directed to prepare a sample solar easement instrument for use in Tennessee.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 743, § 18. April 7, 2016.

Cross-References. Protective easements authorized, title 11, ch. 15.

Statute of frauds, §29-2-101.

66-9-205. Easement to run with the land — Abandonment of easement.

A solar easement shall be presumed to run with the land or lands benefited and burdened, unless the parties to the easement provide otherwise in writing, and shall be deemed to pass with the property when title is transferred unless stated to the contrary in §66-9-204(a)(3). Any solar easements granted under this part may be abandoned in the same manner as other easements as provided by law.

Acts 1979, ch. 259, § 5; T.C.A., §64-9-205.

66-9-206. Writing and recordation required.

Any easement obtained pursuant to this part shall be in writing and shall be recorded with the register of deeds in the county in which the land is situated.

Acts 1979, ch. 259, § 6; T.C.A., §64-9-206.

Cross-References. Index of public records, title 10, ch. 7, part 2.

Statute of frauds, §29-2-101.